Utah statutes.
76-10-1302.   Prostitution.

(1)  A person is guilty of prostitution when:

(a)  he engages in any sexual activity with another person for a fee;

(b)  is an inmate of a house of prostitution; or

(c)  loiters in or within view of any public place for the purpose of being hired to engage in sexual activity.

(2)  Prostitution is a class B misdemeanor.  However, any person who is convicted a second time, and on all subsequent convictions, under this section or under a local ordinance adopted in compliance with Section 76-10-1307 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except as provided in Section 76-10-1309.



Amended by Chapter 179, 1993 General Session

